Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.040

Scope of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter apply to:

(1) Each board, commission or other multimember body, including, but not limited to, those consisting in whole or in part of elective officers;

(2) Each agency, and each employee and position therein, not expressly excluded or exempted under the provisions of RCW 41.06.070 or otherwise excluded or exempted in this chapter.

[ 2021 c 323 s 25; 1969 ex.s. c 36 s 22; 1961 c 1 s 4 (Initiative Measure No. 207, approved November 8, 1960).]